District of Columbia statutes.
14-503

Record of will as prima facie evidence of contents and execution.

A record of a will or codicil recorded in the office of the Register of Wills of the District of Columbia, that has been admitted to probate by a court in the District of Columbia, or a record of the transcript of the record and probate of a will or codicil elsewhere, or of a certified copy thereof filed in the office of the Register of Wills, is prima facie evidence of the contents and due execution of the will or codicil.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 521, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 143(5)
1981 Ed., § 14-503.
1973 Ed., § 14-503.